Mississippi, session 2026, HB1469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 59-21-127, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 59-21-127.  (1)  It shall be the duty of all enforcement officers to enforce, and to obey and carry out all instructions, directions, rules and regulations of the commission with respect to the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.  Each enforcement officer shall account for and pay over, pursuant to law, all monies received by him or her under this chapter. (2)  * * *Such Subject to the provisions of subsections (3) and (4) of this section, enforcement officers shall have the power, and it shall be their duty, to: (a)  Execute all warrants for violations of the rules and regulations of the commission and the provisions of this chapter; (b)  Serve subpoenas issued for the examination and investigation or trial of such violations; (c) * * * to board and examine, without warrant, any vessel required to be numbered under this chapter, to ascertain whether any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation of the commission has been or is being violated, and to use such force as may be necessary for the purpose of such examination and inspection; to a Arrest, without warrant, any person committing a violation of this chapter or the rules and regulations of the commission in the presence of the enforcement officers, and to take such person before a magistrate or court having jurisdiction for trial or hearing; and (d)  Exercise such other powers of peace officers in the enforcement of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the commission or of a judgment for the violation thereof, as are not herein specifically provided. (3)  An enforcement officer may not board a vessel or perform a vessel stop in this state unless the officer has probable cause to believe that a violation of this chapter or a rule or regulation promulgated by the commission has occurred or is occurring. (4)  An enforcement officer may not perform a vessel stop or board a vessel for the sole purpose of performing a safety or marine sanitation equipment inspection.  A violation of safety or marine sanitation requirements is a secondary offense rather than a primary offense. (5)  No enforcement officers shall compromise or settle out of court any violation of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated by the commission. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.